Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 6 Mutual Aid Resource Pacts

25-6-1.
“Jurisdiction” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “jurisdiction” means a federal agency, a state agency, a local governmental subdivision of this state or an adjoining state, or an industrial or private organization which has established a fire-fighting department that is responsible for fire protection services within the area under the control, supervision, or management of the specific “jurisdiction.” A “jurisdiction” may be one of the following, but is not limited to the following: towns, cities, counties outside corporate limits, industrial complexes, specific fire protection areas, military bases, private fire departments, volunteer fire departments, and the like.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 955, §§ 2, 4.

25-6-2.
Formation of pacts authorized; status of members of fire departments of member jurisdictions; “pact” defined.

Whenever two or more jurisdictions, as defined by Code Section 25-6-1, within or adjacent to this state, by written resolution authorize their respective fire departments to render aid and assistance in the extinguishment of fires or other immediate response emergencies outside of their respective jurisdictions, they may, if they so desire, form a district mutual aid system or pact, which shall be a public corporation. It is the primary intent that such system or pact be established for fire emergencies; however, due to the diverse emergency services expected of fire departments, mutual aid systems or pacts may include responses for any form of immediate response emergency as specified by members of the system or pact. Members of fire departments of member jurisdictions shall be considered as officers of a public municipal corporation and shall enjoy the privileges, rights, exemptions, immunities, and duties of such; and this shall apply to paid, volunteer, or private members when responding to or returning from rendering aid in an emergency under a mutual aid system or a pact. As used in this chapter, “pact” means a mutual aid resource pact.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 955, §§ 1, 4.

25-6-3.
Establishment of pacts; organizational meeting; adoption of articles, bylaws, and regulations; board of directors; officers, agents, and personnel.

When two or more jurisdictions desire to establish a pact, each jurisdiction shall designate its fire chief or person or position in charge of its fire department to act for that jurisdiction on all matters relating to the activities and functions of the pact, once it has been established. The jurisdiction shall designate the person or position and its intent to be a member of a pact by a written resolution. The resolutions shall be forwarded to the state fire marshal. Upon receipt of at least two resolutions, the state fire marshal or his authorized representative shall call the first organizational meeting of the system by giving notice to all persons designated by the resolutions to act for potential member jurisdictions. Each jurisdiction shall send its designated person or his authorized representative to the organizational and subsequent meetings. Such person shall be entitled to one vote in all proceedings.

At the organizational meeting, the pact members shall adopt articles of association and bylaws and regulations for the future government and operation of the pact, which shall be effective upon submission to and approval by the Attorney General, who shall cause the same to be promptly recorded by the Secretary of State. Such recording shall formally establish the pact.

At the organizational meeting, the member delegates shall also elect a board of directors consisting of such members as may be determined by the organization delegates. The board of directors shall serve for one year or until their successors are elected and qualified, provided that at the organizational or any subsequent meeting the member delegates may vote for staggered terms for all members of the board of directors, the length of which shall not exceed five years or until the director’s successor is elected and qualified.

The directors shall choose from their number the officers of the pact, who shall have such duties and powers as the bylaws allow. Within the limits of funds available to it, the board of directors may employ and fix the compensation of such agents and other personnel as the board deems necessary to carry out the coordinating functions and other responsibilities of the system. Such personnel shall include a nontactical coordinator who shall serve at the pleasure of the board and who shall have and exercise such powers and authority as the board may delegate to him.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 955, §§ 1, 5.

25-6-4.
Purpose of pacts; powers and duties of pacts generally.

It shall be the primary purpose of a pact to coordinate the emergency fire services of all jurisdictions belonging to it, so as to provide better, more efficient, and more effective cooperation in the protection of life and property from fires or other immediate response emergencies within the area served by the pact.

Any pact established under authority of this chapter is charged with the responsibility of establishing an overall plan or plans for carrying out the intended purpose and other provisions of this chapter. No pact may be established unless it complies with this chapter. Within the limits of funds available to it, the pact may acquire and operate property and equipment, including, but not limited to, a dispatch center and a communications center; and it may extend the advantages of group purchasing and benefits to jurisdictions that are members of the pact. Member jurisdictions shall adopt the training programs of the Georgia Fire Academy in order to ensure a basic standardization of operations and philosophy; this requirement shall not be construed as limiting the training practices or requirements of any jurisdiction, as it is intended that the programs of the Georgia Fire Academy be used to supplement the training practices and requirements of member jurisdictions. The pact shall cooperate with other state and federal agencies and with civil defense authorities on all levels. The state fire marshal may render advice, recommendations, and assistance to a pact, upon request. Members of a pact shall cooperate with the state fire marshal on matters relating to fire investigations and the enforcement of the arson statutes of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 3.

25-6-5.
Liability for failure to respond for purposes of extinguishing fires or other immediate response emergencies; privileges and immunities; liability for loss of men or equipment.

There shall be no liability imposed by law on a pact or any member jurisdiction or its personnel for failure to respond for the purpose of extinguishing or controlling any fire or other immediate response emergency. This immunity is not exclusive of other similar immunities granted by statute or common law.

Any firefighter or other person who is an employee or member of a jurisdiction of a pact while engaged in a duty or activity in connection with this chapter or pursuant to orders or instructions of his superiors, shall be entitled to all rights, privileges, exemptions, and immunities to which he would be entitled if the duty or activity were performed within that firefighter’s or other person’s home jurisdiction.

The loss of men or equipment while in operation under a pact agreement shall be borne as if the loss occurred in the man’s or equipment’s home jurisdiction.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 5.

25-6-6.
Appropriation of funds for pacts by member jurisdictions; receipt of gifts by pacts; entry into agreements with state and federal agencies by pacts.

Jurisdictions belonging to a pact may raise and appropriate money for the purpose of implementing and operating the pact. The pact may receive, hold, and use gifts, bequests, and devises, either outright or in trust, for purposes consistent with this chapter. A pact may enter into agreements with appropriate state and federal agencies to participate in programs which make assistance available to local fire departments.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 6.

25-6-7.
Joining of and withdrawal from pacts by jurisdictions not having fire departments.

Following the initial establishment of a pact, in accordance with procedures established in the bylaws of the pact, jurisdictions which do not have fire departments may join an established pact upon meeting such conditions as the board of directors may fix.

Not less than 90 days after delivering written notice to an officer of the pact, a member jurisdiction may withdraw from a pact after a vote of its governing body. In the event the withdrawal of one or more jurisdictions reduces the number of members but two or more members remain, it is intended that the remaining members should continue with the operation of the pact.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 955, §§ 3, 6.

25-6-8.
Mutual Aid Resource Pact Districts — Establishment; joining or organization of pacts by nonmember jurisdictions desiring to participate in mutual aid.

Pact districts shall be established along the boundaries of counties in which member jurisdictions of a pact are located.

If a nonmember jurisdiction is located within the boundaries of an established pact, it must become a part of that pact should it desire to participate in mutual aid activities. If a county or counties without member jurisdictions are encircled by counties having members of a common pact, the jurisdictions in such county or counties must join the pact should they desire to participate in mutual aid activities. If a county which has no member jurisdictions borders with counties having members of different pacts, the jurisdictions within the county which desire to participate in mutual aid activities must:

Join with one of the bordering pact counties, provided that jurisdictions in the same county shall not be permitted to become members of different pacts; or

Organize a pact, provided two or more jurisdictions are involved, as set forth in Code Section 25-6-2.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 955, §§ 1, 7.

25-6-9.
Mutual Aid Resource Pact Districts — Merger with other districts; communication and cooperation between districts.

Should the member jurisdictions of one or more pact districts desire to merge with another district, the merger may be accomplished in keeping with the intent of Code Section 25-6-8 and as agreed by the board of directors of the concerned pacts.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting communication or cooperation among various pact districts. The boards of directors of various pact districts are encouraged to establish agreements for emergency responses across district lines to fringe areas in the event of emergency and to establish communications to aid in solving problems common to the districts.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 9.

25-6-10.
Continuation of operation of preexistent pacts.

Pacts in existence on July 4, 1976, are authorized to continue to operate under their articles of incorporation or organizational policy.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 11.

25-6-11.
Penalty for violations of chapter.

Any member of the governing body of a jurisdiction or any other person who violates this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be prosecuted by the Attorney General.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 742, § 10.